Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
632

DECLARATORY
JUDGMENTS

Section

632-1 Jurisdiction; controversies subject to

632-2 Appeals

632-3 Further relief upon judgment

632-4, 5 Repealed

632-6 Provisions, remedial

Attorney General Opinions

To the extent that the reciprocal beneficiaries act [L 1997,
c 383] does impose obligations on insurers, it may provide a basis for affected
persons to seek relief by, for example, seeking declaratory relief under this
chapter. Att. Gen. Op. 97-10.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next